Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-15,136
Lease; terms and conditions.

The local housing agency may require that each household occupying a dwelling unit enter into a lease containing such terms and conditions and for such duration as the agency reasonably deems appropriate. No tenant or lessee of, or recipient of assistance from, a local housing agency shall have any right to the renewal of any lease, tenancy, right of occupancy, or assistance, except as expressly agreed by the agency. All members of the household who are permitted to reside in a dwelling unit must be identified in any lease of a dwelling.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 65.